District of Columbia statutes.
31-3931.10

Name.

A captive insurer shall not use or adopt a name that is the same as, deceptively similar to, or likely to be confused with or mistaken for any other insurer licensed in the District.

History

Mar. 17, 2005, D.C. Law 15-262, § 11, 52 DCR 1205

Section References

This section is referenced in § 31-3932.03.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 11 of Captive Insurance Company Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-640, November 30, 2004, 52 DCR 1238).